Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.29
Communications Revolving Fund;
established; use; investment.

There is hereby established a revolving fund to be known
as the Communications Revolving Fund. Beginning July 1, 2011, appropriations
made to the division of communications of the office of Chief Information
Officer for the purposes of sections 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.28 shall be credited
to the fund. Beginning July 1, 2011, all funds received under such sections
and all funds received for communications services provided to any agency,
department, political subdivision, or other user shall be credited to the
fund. The division shall, under policies and procedures established by the
director, expend funds from time to time credited to the fund for the communications
purposes enumerated in such sections. Any money in the Communications Revolving
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

Laws 2011, LB378, § 29.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.